Massachusetts, session 194th, H2656.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 13 of chapter 125 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
adding the following paragraph:-  
The superintendent of each state correctional facility and administrator of each county 
correctional facility shall designate 1 staff member as the LGBTQI+ coordinator. The LGBTQI+ 
coordinator shall: 
(i) ensure compliance with housing compatibility standards; 
(ii) coordinate education, employment, and program placement for incarcerated persons 
who are LGBTQI+, as defined in section 1 of chapter 127; 

of 9 9  (iii) support self-facilitated LGBTQI+ groups and leisure activities as defined in section 
32C; 
(iv) after consulting with incarcerated persons, ensure at least one periodical is available 
in each institutional library pertaining to living well with HIV and at least one periodical 
pertaining to the LGBTQI+ community, and 
(v) perform other necessary responsibilities. The LGBTQI+ coordinator shall be a 
Correctional Program Officer employed by the Massachusetts Department of Correction or a 
licensed clinical social worker in houses of correction. 
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 127 of the General Laws, and section 1 of chapter 125 
as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting the following definitions:-  
“LGBTQI+”, lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, intersex or not conforming to a 
specific gender identity or sexual orientation. 
"General Population", any housing placement where an incarcerated person is not held in 
restrictive housing. In no event shall any general population unit have conditions that are similar 
to or more restrictive than restrictive housing. General population conditions shall ensure an 
incarcerated person’s reasonable access to: out of cell time; programming, education, the yard, 
gym, and other recreational spaces; the law library; religious services; canteen; all personal 
property; visitation, including both the total available visitation time and the opportunity for 
contact visits; telephones and video visits; opportunities to earn a wage, and opportunities to earn 
good time, as available in the facility. All such access shall be maximized as much as possible. 
“Incarcerated Person”, inmate, prisoner, or detainee.  

of 9 30  “Consensual”, free from fraud, force, or coercion; provided, however, that any sexual 
contact or relations between correctional officers and incarcerated persons shall not be deemed 
consensual.  
SECTION 3. Said chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 21 the following section:-  
Section 21A. Upon intake at a correctional facility, each incarcerated person shall be 
provided an opportunity to voluntarily disclose their sexual orientation and gender identity, 
provided further that an incarcerated person may also disclose this information at any time 
during their incarceration. The correctional facility shall document the information which shall 
be made available to the LGBTQI+ coordinator, staff persons who use the information for 
classification purposes and any other purpose related to implementing the National Standards to 
Prevent, Detect, and Respond to Prison Rape Under the Prison Rape Elimination Act (PREA), 
and any other staff persons designated by the commissioner of correction or sheriff; provided, 
however, that the commissioner and sheriffs shall minimize access to sensitive information. 
Aggregated data on the number of incarcerated persons who voluntarily disclosed their sexual 
orientation and gender identity shall be made publicly available on an annual basis for each 
correctional facility; provided, however, that the report shall not include any personally 
identifiable information.  
SECTION 4. Section 22 of said chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following paragraph:-  
Upon intake at a correctional facility, each incarcerated person shall be provided an 
opportunity to voluntarily disclose personally held homophobic or transphobic sentiments, 

of 9 52 provided further that the incarcerated person may also disclose this information at any time 
during their incarceration. The correctional facility shall document the information, whether it is 
provided by the incarcerated person or observed by facility staff at any time. Anyone who 
discloses, is reasonably believed to harbor, or demonstrates behavior consistent with 
homophobic or transphobic sentiments shall not be housed in the same cell as someone who 
identifies as LGBTQI+ or who may be perceived as LGBTQI+; provided that no person shall be 
punished for disclosure or nondisclosure of such information. Information obtained consistent 
with this section shall not be shared with the Department of Probation or the Parole 
Board.  Aggregated data on the number of incarcerated persons who disclose, are reasonably 
believed to harbor, or demonstrate behavior consistent with homophobic or transphobic 
sentiments shall be made publicly available on an annual basis for each correctional facility; 
provided, however, that the report shall not include any personally identifiable information. 
SECTION 5. Said chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 32A the following 3 sections:- 
Section 32B. For the purposes of this section, the term “superintendent” shall mean the 
superintendent of each state correctional facility and administrator of each county correctional 
facility. 
Each correctional facility shall make publicly available on their websites anonymized 
data, aggregated annually, no later than June 30, that is required by Standard 115.87 of the 
National Standards to Prevent, Detect, and Respond to Prison Rape Under the Prison Rape 
Elimination Act, 28 C.F.R. Part 115, promulgated pursuant to the federal Prison Rape 

of 9 73 Elimination Act of 2003, codified in 34 U.S.C. §§ 30301 to 30309, inclusive, hereinafter the 
PREA Standards, publicly available on their website. 
For each PREA investigation conducted, the correctional facility shall make publicly 
available on their website the factual basis for each PREA investigation, including, but not 
limited to, whether it was initiated by staff, an incarcerated person, or a third party; a detailed 
description of the alleged incident, whether the investigated behavior was consensual, and the 
general location of the alleged incident, evidence relied upon to determine final investigatory 
outcomes, and any actions taken to respond to the allegation. 
Furthermore, the department will report on the race, age, disability status, sexual 
orientation, and gender identity of incarcerated persons involved delineated by whether they 
were a victim, perpetrator, or consensual party to said investigation; provided however, that the 
detailed description of the complaint shall not include any personally identifiable information of 
incarcerated persons.  
Annually, each correctional facility shall make publicly available on their website the 
incident-based data that would be necessary to answer all questions from the most recent version 
of the Survey of Sexual Violence conducted by the Department of Justice; provided, however, 
that the data shall not include any personally identifiable information of incarcerated persons. All 
formal or informal institutional grievances and federal Americans With Disabilities Act requests 
related to sexual abuse or the general wellbeing of LGBTQI+ persons and those living with 
HIV shall be redacted and made publicly available on each correctional facility’s website.  
Section 32C. (a) Notwithstanding any general law or special law to the contrary, the state 
auditor shall be provided with access to all PREA-related records, including, but not limited to, 

of 9 95 all information contained in each facility’s PREA database and any information provided to any 
PREA auditor before, during or after a PREA audit, including documents or records reviewed 
on-site. The state auditor shall also be provided access to all state prisons and houses of 
correction in the commonwealth and shall be allowed to privately interview incarcerated people, 
and staff to the extent practicable. (b) The state auditor shall prepare an annual report, produced 
100 not later than February 1, analyzing risk factors and systemic issues regarding sexual abuse in 
101 state prisons and houses of correction, as well as specific recommendations to improve 
102 outcomes. The state auditor shall submit its annual report to the governor, the attorney general 
103 and the joint committee on the judiciary, and the report shall be publicly available. 
104  Section 32D.  Each correctional facility shall provide meaningful opportunities for 
105 LGBTQI+ incarcerated persons to: 
106  (i) congregate; 
107  (ii) form and self-facilitate self-help or support groups; 
108  (iii) receive LGBTQI+ themed literature in the institutional library, including one 
109 commonly read periodical about living well with HIV and one commonly read periodical about 
110 the LGBTQI+ community; (iv) watch LGBTQI+ movies free of charge; and 
111  (v) celebrate June as Pride month. Provided further, each correctional facility shall allow 
112 visitors to participate in subsection (ii) and subsection (v).  
113  Section 39A of said chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out 
114 subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:- 

of 9 115  SECTION 6. Section 38F of said chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
116 striking out Section 38F and inserting in place thereof the following:- 
117  Section 38F. An incarcerated person shall not file any claim that may be the subject of a 
118 grievance under section 38E unless the incarcerated person has exhausted the administrative 
119 remedy established pursuant to said section 38E; but the court shall consider such claim if a final 
120 administrative resolution of a grievance filed pursuant to said section 38E has not been decided 
121 within 180 days from the date of filing such a grievance, or if the incarcerated person can 
122 demonstrate to the court that exigent circumstances exist which, if delayed pursuant to the 
123 requirements of this section, would jeopardize the life or seriously impair the health of the 
124 incarcerated person, or, for actions seeking equitable relief; or if the claim by an incarcerated 
125 person is directly related to sexual abuse, serious bodily harm, or medical issues. 
126  SECTION 7. Section 39A of said chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
127 striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:- 
128  (c) The fact that an incarcerated person identifies as LGBTQI+ shall not be grounds for 
129 involuntary placement in restrictive housing or involuntary removal from the general population, 
130 provided however, that an incarcerated person who identifies as LGBTQI+ may request to be 
131 removed from the general population for their own safety at any time.  
132  SECTION 8. Section 39A of said chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby further amended 
133 by striking out subsection (f) and inserting in place thereof the following 4 subsections:- 
134  (f) No incarcerated person shall be placed in restrictive housing, removed from general 
135 population, or disciplined in any way for reporting in good faith an act of sexual abuse, provided 

of 9 136 that an incarcerated person may request to be removed from general population for their own 
137 safety at any time.  
138  (g) Any incarcerated person that engages in consensual sexual activity shall not be 
139 removed from general population. Provided further, such behavior shall not be grounds for 
140 removal of visitation, or phone privileges, provided further, any guilty finding on a disciplinary 
141 report for consensual sexual activity shall not be used in determining the classification status or 
142 parole eligibility of an incarcerated person.  
143  (h) Affectionate, non-sexual contact between incarcerated persons, including but not 
144 limited to handshakes, hugs, touching of another's hair and other forms of non-sexual contact, 
145 shall not be subject to disciplinary action, nor shall such incidents be used as a basis to punish or 
146 penalize an incarcerated person in any way. 
147  (i) An incarcerated person shall not be confined to restrictive housing except pursuant to 
148 section 39 or this section. 
149  SECTION 9. Section 16 of said chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
150 adding the following 3 sections:  
151  16A: Each correctional facility shall ensure that an incarcerated person that requests 
152 access to medication to prevent the transmission of HIV be provided such medication at no cost 
153 to the incarcerated person, provided further, that reasons for requesting said medication shall be 
154 kept confidential between the medical provider and incarcerated person and not be shared with 
155 security or administrative staff, provided however, that said medication shall only be provided if 
156 clinically appropriate. 

of 9 157  16B: Each correctional facility shall ensure that any incarcerated person prescribed 
158 medication to prevent the transmission of HIV or to control and manage HIV, whether held on 
159 pre-trial or committed status, shall be provided a thirty-day supply upon release from custody.  
160  16C: Each correctional facility shall ensure that an incarcerated person prescribed 
161 medication to control and manage HIV shall be permitted to keep said medication on their 
162 person or in their cell to ensure regular and timely dosage of said medication. 
163  SECTION 10. Section 32A of said chapter 127, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
164 adding the following sentence:- 
165  Any incarcerated person with a gender dysphoria diagnosis shall also be housed in a 
166 single occupancy cell, unless they request otherwise, provided that the facility is at or below 90% 
167 occupancy on the day of assignment. 
168  SECTION 11. Said chapter 127 is hereby amended by inserting after section 39H the 
169 following section:- 
170  Section 39I. The Commissioner and sheriffs shall ensure that all mental health providers 
171 within their facilities, hired or contracted, are trained in and can demonstrate cultural 
172 competency in working with LGBTQI+ individuals.